Colorado, session 2026A, HB1144.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 18-12-119 as
follows:
18-12-119. Unlawful three-dimensional printing of a firearm or
firearm component - penalties - definitions.
(1) (a) A PERSON SHALL NOT KNOWINGLY MANUFACTURE OR
PRODUCE A FIREARM OR FIREARM COMPONENT BY MEANS OF
THREE-DIMENSIONAL PRINTING USING A THREE-DIMENSIONAL PRINTER, CNC
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

MILLING MACHINE, OR SIMILAR DEVICE.
(b) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION (1) COMMITS
UNLAWFUL THREE-DIMENSIONAL PRINTING OF A FIREARM OR FIREARM
COMPONENT. UNLAWFUL THREE-DIMENSIONAL PRINTING OF A FIREARM OR
FIREARM COMPONENT IS A CLASS 1 MISDEMEANOR; EXCEPT THAT A SECOND
OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE IS A CLASS 5 FELONY.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (1) DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARM MANUFACTURER;
(II) AN INSTRUCTOR OR STUDENT OF AN ACCREDITED GUNSMITHING
PROGRAM, OR AN INSTITUTION THAT OPERATES AN ACCREDITED
GUNSMITHING PROGRAM, WHEN THE MANUFACTURE IS SOLELY FOR
PURPOSES OF EDUCATIONAL INSTRUCTION WITHIN THE ACCREDITED
GUNSMITHING PROGRAM.
(2) THIS SECTION ONLY APPLIES TO POTENTIALLY FUNCTIONAL
FIREARMS AND FIREARM COMPONENTS AND DOES NOT APPLY TO THE
THREE-DIMENSIONAL PRINTING OF ANY OTHER COMPONENTS OR
COMPONENTS THAT COULD BE USED TO MAKE A NON-FUNCTIONING OR PROP
FIREARM.
(3) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "CNC MILLING MACHINE" MEANS A COMPUTER NUMERICAL
CONTROL MILLING MACHINE.
(b) "FIREARM COMPONENT" MEANS AN UNFINISHED FRAME OR
RECEIVER, LARGE-CAPACITY MAGAZINE, OR RAPID-FIRE DEVICE.
(c) "GUNSMITHING PROGRAM" MEANS A GUNSMITHING PROGRAM
OPERATED BY AN INSTITUTION.
(d) "INSTITUTION" MEANS A STATE-AUTHORIZED INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION OR INSTITUTION REGULATED BY THE COLORADO
DIVISION OF PRIVATE OCCUPATIONAL SCHOOLS.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1144

(e) "LARGE-CAPACITY MAGAZINE" HAS THE SAME MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 18-12-301.
(f) "THREE-DIMENSIONAL PRINTING" OR "3-D PRINTING" MEANS
ADDITIVE MANUFACTURING THAT BUILDS THREE-DIMENSIONAL OBJECTS BY
USE OF A THREE-DIMENSIONAL PRINTER OR SIMILAR DEVICE AND
SUBTRACTIVE MANUFACTURING THAT CREATES OBJECTS BY REMOVING
MATERIAL FROM A WORKPIECE BY USE OF A CNC MILLING MACHINE OR
SIMILAR DEVICE.
SECTION 2. Severability. If any provision of this act or the
application of this act to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that can
be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end
the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
SECTION 3. Effective date - applicability. This act takes effect
July 1, 2026, and applies to offenses committed on or after said date.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1144

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1144